Utah statutes.
53A-11-306.   Conditional enrollment -- Suspension for noncompliance --
Procedure.
(1)  Conditional enrollment time periods may be modified by the department by
legally adopted rules.
(2)  The requirements for conditional enrollment shall apply to each student
unless that student is exempted under Section 53A-11-302.
(3)  After five days written notice of a pending suspension and of the
student's rights under Section 53A-11-302 shall be mailed to the last-known
address of a parent, guardian, or legal age brother or sister of a student who
is without parent or guardian, the governing authority of any school shall
prohibit further attendance by a student under a conditional enrollment who
has failed to obtain the immunization required within time period set forth in
Section 53A-11-302 or otherwise established by rule.
(4)  Parents or guardians of children who are prohibited from attending school
for failure to comply with the provisions of this part shall be referred to
the juvenile court.
